Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.490

Electronic wills—Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

[ 2021 c 140 s 1010.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 140 ss 1001-1016: See note following RCW 11.12.400.